Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB567.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.592 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, pregnant women, new
parents[mothers] up to twenty-four (24)[twelve (12)] months postpartum, and
children up to age one (1) shall be eligible for participation in the Kentucky
Medical Assistance Program if:
(a) They have family income up to but not exceeding one hundred and eighty-five
percent (185%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines as
promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services of the United
States as revised annually; and
(b) They are otherwise eligible for the program.
(2) The percentage established in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be increased to
the extent:
(a) Permitted under federal law; and
(b) Funding is available.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:57 AM Jacketed